Hawaii statutes.
§414D-182 Procedure to amend
articles of incorporation. (a) Amendments to the articles of
incorporation shall be made in the following manner:

(1) If any members are entitled to vote on an
amendment, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution setting forth the
proposed amendment and directing that it be submitted to a vote at an annual,
regular, or special meeting of the members. Notice setting forth the proposed
amendment or a summary of the changes to be effected by the proposed amendments
shall be given to each member entitled to vote at the meeting within the time
and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings
to members. The proposed amendment shall be adopted upon receiving at least
two-thirds of the votes that members present at the meeting or represented by
proxy are entitled to cast; and

(2) If there are no members or no members entitled to
vote on an amendment, an amendment shall be adopted at a meeting of the board
of directors upon its receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in
office.

(b) Any number of amendments may be submitted
and voted upon at any one meeting. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 37,
§12; am L 2012, c 58, §9]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next